District of Columbia statutes.
7-1707

Severability.

If any provision of this subchapter, or its application to a particular person or circumstance is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this subchapter.

Sept. 28, 1979, D.C. Law 3-22, § 9, 26 DCR 390
1981 Ed., § 6-917.
1973 Ed., § 6-827.
Delegation of authority under D.C. Law 3-22, the District of Columbia Smoking Restriction Act of 1979, see Mayor’s Order 90-192, December 13, 1990.